Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4931.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 145.903, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. School-based health center services. (a) Services provided by a school-based health center may include but are not limited to: (1) preventive health care; (2) chronic medical condition management, including diabetes and asthma care; (3) mental health care deleted text begin anddeleted text end new text begin ,new text end crisis managementnew text begin , trauma recovery, and operating support groupsnew text end ; (4) acute care for illness and injury; (5) oral health care; (6) vision care; (7) nutritional counseling; (8) substance abuse counseling; (9) referral to a specialist, medical home, or hospital for care; new text begin (10) care coordination among schools, families, and community health care providers; new text end new text begin (11) home visits and community-based care to provide services to students unable to safely attend school; new text end deleted text begin (10)deleted text end new text begin (12)new text end additional services that address social determinants of health; and deleted text begin (11)deleted text end new text begin (13)new text end emerging services such as mobile health and new text begin the provision of health services and mental health services via new text end telehealth. new text begin (b) Services provided via telehealth must be provided in conjunction with in-person care to the extent possible, or must be provided responsively to students when not in attendance at school. new text end deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end Services provided by a school-based health center must not replace the daily student support provided in the school by educational student service providers, including but not limited to licensed school nurses, educational psychologists, school social workers, and school counselors. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin SCHOOL-BASED HEALTH CENTER STABILIZATION GRANTS.new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of health shall make available stabilization grants to each open and operating school-based health center, as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 145.903, subdivision 1, paragraph (b). Stabilization grants must be up to $50,000 per school-based health center in fiscal year 2026 and up to $50,000 per school-based health center in fiscal year 2027. A school-based health center receiving a stabilization grant must use the grant funds to engage in one or more of the following: new text end new text begin (1) expanding the provision of health services and mental health services via telehealth; new text end new text begin (2) providing health services via home visits and community-based care to students unable to safely attend school; new text end new text begin (3) strengthening care coordination among schools, families, and community health care providers, including by expanding the provision of translation and interpretation services; new text end new text begin (4) upgrading electronic health record systems and patient access systems to streamline communications between patients and providers; new text end new text begin (5) providing trauma recovery services, grief counseling, and other nonclinical mental health supports to, and operating support groups with, students and school staff; new text end new text begin (6) providing services to uninsured and underinsured students; and new text end new text begin (7) in agreement with the host school, providing services to area children who are not enrolled in the school but who have barriers to accessing health care. new text end new text begin (b) School-based health centers that receive a stabilization grant under this section must comply with the reporting requirements in Minnesota Statutes, section 145.903, subdivision 2, paragraph (d), regarding uses of grant funds and performance measures. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin (a) $2,700,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $2,700,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of health for stabilization grants to school-based health centers. This is a onetime appropriation. Of these appropriations: new text end new text begin (1) $2,300,000 each year is for school-based health center stabilization grants; new text end new text begin (2) $150,000 each year is for a grant to the nonprofit organization identified in Minnesota Statutes, section 145.903, subdivision 2, paragraph (c), for the provision of technical assistance statewide to school-based health centers; and new text end new text begin (3) $250,000 each year is for administration. new text end new text begin (b) The general fund base for the school-based health centers program under Minnesota Statutes, section 145.903, is increased by $2,700,000 in fiscal year 2028 and $2,700,000 in fiscal year 2029. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end